Missouri, session 2026, SB1713.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 393.190, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 393.190,
to read as follows:
393.190. 1. No gas corporation, electrical
corporation, water corporation or sewer corporation shall
hereafter sell, assign, lease, transfer, mortgage or
otherwise dispose of or encumber the whole or any part of
its franchise, works or system, necessary or useful in the
performance of its duties to the public, nor by any means,
direct or indirect, merge or consolidate such works or
system, or franchises, or any part thereof, with any other
corporation, person or public utility, without having first
secured from the commission an order authorizing it so to
do. Every such sale, assignment, lease, transfer, mortgage,
disposition, encumbrance, merger or consolidation made other
than in accordance with the order of the commission
authorizing same shall be void. The permission and approval
of the commission to the exercise of a franchise or permit
under this chapter, or the sale, assignment, lease,
transfer, mortgage or other disposition or encumbrance of a

SB 1713 2
franchise or permit under this section shall not be
construed to revive or validate any lapsed or invalid
franchise or permit, or to enlarge or add to the powers or
privileges contained in the grant of any franchise or
permit, or to waive any forfeiture. Any person seeking any
order under this subsection authorizing the sale,
assignment, lease, transfer, merger, consolidation or other
disposition, direct or indirect, of any gas corporation,
electrical corporation, water corporation, or sewer
corporation, shall, at the time of application for any such
order, file with the commission a statement, in such form,
manner and detail as the commission shall require, as to
what, if any, impact such sale, assignment, lease, transfer,
merger, consolidation, or other disposition will have on the
tax revenues of the political subdivisions in which any
structures, facilities or equipment of the corporations
involved in such disposition are located. The commission
shall send a copy of all information obtained by it as to
what, if any, impact such sale, assignment, lease, transfer,
merger, consolidation or other disposition will have on the
tax revenues of various political subdivisions to the county
clerk of each county in which any portion of a political
subdivision which will be affected by such disposition is
located. Nothing in this subsection contained shall be
construed to prevent the sale, assignment, lease or other
disposition by any corporation, person or public utility of
a class designated in this subsection of property which is
not necessary or useful in the performance of its duties to
the public, and any sale of its property by such
corporation, person or public utility shall be conclusively
presumed to have been of property which is not useful or

SB 1713 3
necessary in the performance of its duties to the public, as
to any purchaser of such property in good faith for value.
2. No such corporation shall directly or indirectly
acquire the stock or bonds of any other corporation
incorporated for, or engaged in, the same or a similar
business, or proposing to operate or operating under a
franchise from the same or any other municipality; neither
shall any street railroad corporation acquire the stock or
bonds of any electrical corporation, unless, in either case,
authorized so to do by the commission. Save where stock
shall be transferred or held for the purpose of collateral
security, no stock corporation of any description, domestic
or foreign, other than a gas corporation, electrical
corporation, water corporation, sewer corporation or street
railroad corporation, shall, without the consent of the
commission, purchase or acquire, take or hold, more than ten
percent of the total capital stock issued by any gas
corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation or
sewer corporation organized or existing under or by virtue
of the laws of this state, except that a corporation now
lawfully holding a majority of the capital stock of any gas
corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation or
sewer corporation may, with the consent of the commission,
acquire and hold the remainder of the capital stock of such
gas corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation
or sewer corporation, or any portion thereof.
3. No person, public utility, or other corporation
shall purchase or acquire, take, or hold fifty percent or
more of the total capital stock issued by any sewer or water
corporation that regularly provides service to eight
thousand or fewer customers without notifying the commission
within thirty days of said acquisition.

SB 1713 4
4. Notwithstanding subsection 3 of this section, any
sewer or water corporation that regularly provides service
to eight thousand or fewer customers that is delinquent in
filing its public service commission annual report or is six
months or more delinquent in paying its public service
commission assessment or is in violation of any other public
service commission or Missouri department of natural
resources rules or regulations shall not sell or transfer
fifty percent or more of its total capital stock issued
without the consent of the commission.
5. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to
prevent the holding of stock heretofore lawfully acquired,
or to prevent upon the surrender or exchange of said stock
pursuant to a reorganization plan, the purchase,
acquisition, taking or holding of a proportionate amount of
stock of any new corporation organized to take over, at
foreclosure or other sale, the property of any corporation
whose stock has been thus surrendered or exchanged. Every
contract, assignment, transfer or agreement for transfer of
100 any stock by or through any person or corporation to any
101 corporation in violation of any provision of this chapter
102 shall be void and of no effect, and no such transfer or
103 assignment shall be made upon the books of any such gas
104 corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation or
105 sewer corporation or shall be recognized as effective for
106 any purpose.
107 6. No sale, assignment, lease, transfer, mortgage,
108 disposition, encumbrance, merger, or consolidation of a
109 public utility, as defined in section 386.020, shall be
110 permitted unless the public service commission makes a
111 finding that such transaction is in the public interest.
✓